California statutes. Penal Code
(C) Any record relating to an incident in which a sustained finding was made by any law enforcement agency or oversight agency involving dishonesty by a peace officer or custodial officer directly relating to the reporting, investigation, or prosecution of a crime, or directly relating to the reporting of, or investigation of misconduct by, another peace officer or custodial officer, including, but not limited to, any false statements, filing false reports, destruction, falsifying, or concealing of evidence, or perjury.

(D) Any record relating to an incident in which a sustained finding was made by any law enforcement agency or oversight agency that a peace officer or custodial officer engaged in conduct, including, but not limited to, verbal statements, writings, online posts,
 recordings, and gestures, involving prejudice or discrimination against a person on the basis of race, religious creed, color, national origin, ancestry, physical disability, mental disability, medical condition, genetic information, marital status, sex, gender, gender identity, gender expression, age, sexual orientation, or military and veteran status.

(E) Any record relating to an incident in which a sustained finding was made by any law enforcement agency or oversight agency that the peace officer made an unlawful arrest or conducted an unlawful search.

(F) An agreement prohibited by subdivision (e) of Section 13510.9.

(2) Records that are subject to disclosure under clause (iii) or (iv) of subparagraph (A) of
 paragraph (1), or under subparagraph (D) or (E) of paragraph (1), relating to an incident that occurs before January 1, 2022, shall not be subject to the time limitations
 in paragraph (11) until January 1, 2023.

(3) Records that shall be released pursuant to this subdivision include all investigative reports; photographic, audio, and video evidence; transcripts or recordings of interviews; autopsy reports; all materials compiled and presented for review to the district attorney or to any person or body charged with determining whether to file criminal charges against an officer in connection with an incident, whether the officer’s action was consistent with law and agency policy for purposes of discipline or administrative action, or what discipline to impose or corrective action to take; documents setting forth findings or recommended findings; and copies of disciplinary records relating to the incident, including any letters of intent to impose discipline, any documents reflecting modifications
 of discipline due to the Skelly or grievance process, and letters indicating final imposition of discipline or other
 documentation reflecting implementation of corrective action. Records that shall be released pursuant to this subdivision also include records relating to an incident specified in paragraph (1) in which the peace officer or custodial officer resigned before the law enforcement agency or oversight agency concluded its investigation into the alleged incident.

(4) A record from a separate and prior investigation or assessment of a separate incident shall not be released unless it is independently subject to disclosure pursuant to this subdivision.

(5) If an investigation or incident involves multiple officers, information about allegations of misconduct by, or the analysis or disposition of an investigation of, an officer shall not be released pursuant to subparagraph (B), (C),
 (D), or (E) of paragraph (1), unless it relates to a sustained finding regarding that officer that is itself subject to disclosure pursuant to this section. However, factual information about that action of an officer during an incident, or the statements of an officer about an incident, shall be released if they are relevant to a finding against another officer that is subject to release pursuant to subparagraph (B), (C), (D), or (E) of paragraph (1).

(6) An agency shall redact a record disclosed pursuant to this section only for any of the following purposes:

(A) To remove personal data or information, such as a home address, telephone number, or identities of family members, other than the names and work-related information of peace and custodial officers.

(B) To preserve the anonymity of whistleblowers, complainants, victims, and witnesses.

(C) To protect confidential medical, financial, or other information of which disclosure is specifically prohibited by federal law or would cause an unwarranted invasion of personal privacy that clearly outweighs the strong public interest in records about possible misconduct and use of force by peace officers and custodial officers.

(D) (i) Where there is a specific, articulable, and particularized reason to believe that disclosure of the record would pose a significant danger to the physical safety of the peace officer, custodial officer, or another person.

(ii) In an action to compel disclosure brought pursuant to Section 7923.000 of the Government Code, in determining whether a redaction made pursuant to clause (i) is appropriate, a court shall consider whether a particular peace officer is currently operating undercover and their duties demand anonymity.

(7) Notwithstanding paragraph (6), an agency may redact a record disclosed pursuant to this section, including personal identifying information, where, on the facts of the particular case, the public interest served by not disclosing the information clearly outweighs the public interest served by disclosure of the information.

(8) An agency may withhold a record of an incident described in paragraph (1) that is the subject of an active criminal or administrative investigation, in accordance with any of the following:

(A) (i) During an active criminal investigation, disclosure may be delayed for up to 60 days from the date the misconduct or use of force occurred or until the district attorney determines whether to file criminal charges related to the misconduct or use of force, whichever occurs sooner. If an agency delays disclosure pursuant to this clause, the agency shall provide, in writing, the specific basis for the agency’s determination that the interest in delaying disclosure clearly outweighs the public interest in disclosure. This writing shall include the estimated date
 for disclosure of the withheld information.

(ii) After 60 days from the misconduct or use of force, the agency may continue to delay the disclosure of records or information if the disclosure could reasonably be expected to interfere with a criminal enforcement proceeding against an officer who engaged in misconduct or use of force. If an agency delays disclosure pursuant to this clause, the agency shall, at 180-day intervals as necessary, provide, in writing, the specific basis for the agency’s determination that disclosure could reasonably be expected to interfere with a criminal enforcement proceeding. The writing shall include the estimated date for the disclosure of the withheld information. Information withheld by the agency shall be disclosed when the specific basis for withholding is resolved, when the investigation or
 proceeding is no longer active, or by no later than 18 months after the date of the incident, whichever occurs sooner.

(iii) After 60 days from the misconduct or use of force, the agency may continue to delay the disclosure of records or information if the disclosure could reasonably be expected to interfere with a criminal enforcement proceeding against someone other than the officer who engaged in the misconduct or
 use of force. If an agency delays disclosure under this clause, the agency shall, at 180-day intervals, provide, in writing, the specific basis why disclosure could reasonably be expected to interfere with a criminal enforcement proceeding, and shall provide an estimated date for the disclosure of the withheld information. Information withheld by the agency shall be disclosed when the specific basis for withholding is resolved, when the investigation or proceeding is no longer active, or by no later than 18 months after the date of the incident, whichever occurs sooner, unless extraordinary circumstances warrant continued delay due to the ongoing criminal investigation or proceeding. In that case, the agency must show by clear and convincing evidence that the interest in preventing prejudice to the active and ongoing criminal investigation or proceeding outweighs the public interest in
 prompt disclosure of records about misconduct or use of force by peace officers and custodial officers. The agency shall release all information subject to disclosure that does not cause substantial prejudice, including any documents that have otherwise become available.

(iv) In an action to compel disclosure brought pursuant to Section 7923.000 of the Government Code, an agency may justify delay by filing an application to seal the basis for withholding, in accordance with Rule 2.550 of the California Rules of Court, or any successor rule, if disclosure of the written basis itself would impact a privilege or compromise a pending investigation.

(B) If criminal charges are filed related to the incident in which misconduct occurred or force was used, the agency may delay the disclosure
 of records or information until a verdict on those charges is returned at trial or, if a plea of guilty or no contest is entered, the time to withdraw the plea pursuant to Section 1018.

(C) During an administrative investigation into an incident described in paragraph (1), the agency may delay the disclosure of records or information until the investigating agency determines whether the misconduct or use of force violated a law or agency policy, but no longer than 180 days after the date of the employing agency’s discovery of the misconduct or use of force, or allegation of misconduct or use of force, by a person authorized to initiate an investigation.

(9) A record of a complaint, or the investigations, findings, or dispositions of that complaint, shall not be released pursuant to this
 section if the complaint is frivolous, as defined in Section 128.5 of the Code of Civil Procedure, or if the complaint is unfounded.

(10) The cost of copies of records subject to disclosure pursuant to this subdivision that are made available upon the payment of fees covering direct costs of duplication pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 7922.530 of the Government Code shall not include the costs of searching for, editing, or redacting the records.

(11) Except to the extent temporary withholding for a longer period is permitted pursuant to paragraph (8), records subject to disclosure under this subdivision shall be provided at the earliest possible time and no later than 45 days from the date of a request for their disclosure.

(12) (A) For purposes of releasing records pursuant to this subdivision, the lawyer-client privilege does not prohibit the disclosure of either of the following:

(i) Factual information provided by the public entity to its attorney or factual information discovered in any investigation conducted by, or on behalf of, the public entity’s attorney.

(ii) Billing records related to the work done by the attorney so long as the records do not relate to active and ongoing litigation and do not disclose information for the purpose of legal consultation between the public entity and its attorney.

(B) This paragraph does not prohibit the public entity from asserting that a record or information within the
 record is exempted or prohibited from disclosure pursuant to any other federal or state law.

(13) Notwithstanding subdivision (a) or any other law, an agency that formerly employed a peace officer or custodial officer may, without receiving a request for disclosure, disclose to the public the termination for cause of that officer by that agency for any disclosable incident, including those described in subparagraphs (A) to (E), inclusive, of paragraph (1). Any such disclosure shall be at the discretion of the agency and shall not include any information otherwise prohibited from disclosure. This paragraph is declaratory of existing law.

(c) Notwithstanding subdivisions (a) and (b), a department or agency shall release to the complaining party a copy of the complaining
 party’s own statements at the time the complaint is filed.

(d) Notwithstanding subdivisions (a) and (b), a department or agency that employs peace or custodial officers may disseminate data regarding the number, type, or disposition of complaints (sustained, not sustained, exonerated, or unfounded) made against its officers if that information is in a form that does not identify the individuals involved.

(e) Notwithstanding subdivisions (a) and (b), a department or agency that employs peace or custodial officers may release factual information concerning a disciplinary investigation if the officer who is the subject of the disciplinary investigation, or the officer’s agent or representative, publicly makes a statement they know to be false concerning the investigation or the
 imposition of disciplinary action. Information may not be disclosed by the peace or custodial officer’s employer unless the false statement was published by an established medium of communication, such as television, radio, or a newspaper. Disclosure of factual information by the employing agency pursuant to this subdivision is limited to facts contained in the officer’s personnel file concerning the disciplinary investigation or imposition of disciplinary action that specifically refute the false statements made public by the peace or custodial officer or their agent or representative.

(f) (1) The department or agency shall provide written notification to the complaining party of the disposition of the complaint within 30 days of the disposition.

(2) The
 notification described in this subdivision is not conclusive or binding or admissible as evidence in any separate or subsequent action or proceeding brought before an arbitrator, court, or judge of this state or the United States.

(g) This section does not affect the discovery or disclosure of information contained in a peace or custodial officer’s personnel file pursuant to Section 1043 of the Evidence Code.

(h) This section does not supersede or affect the criminal discovery process outlined in Chapter 10 (commencing with Section 1054) of Title 6 of Part 2, or the admissibility of personnel records pursuant to subdivision (a), which codifies the court decision in Pitchess v. Superior Court (1974) 11 Cal.3d 531.

(i) Nothing in this chapter is intended to limit the public’s right of access as provided for in Long Beach Police Officers Association v. City of Long Beach (2014) 59 Cal.4th 59.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 729, Sec. 2.3.   (AB 1388)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

832.8.

As used in Section 832.7, the following words or phrases have the following meanings:

(a) “Personnel records” means any file maintained under that individual’s name by his or her employing agency and containing records relating to any of the following:

(1) Personal data, including marital status, family members, educational and employment history, home addresses, or similar information.

(2) Medical history.

(3) Election of employee benefits.

(4) Employee advancement, appraisal, or discipline.

(5) Complaints, or investigations of complaints, concerning an event or transaction in which he or she participated, or which he or she perceived, and pertaining to the manner in which he or she performed his or her duties.

(6) Any other information the disclosure of which would constitute an unwarranted invasion of personal privacy.

(b) “Sustained” means a final determination by an investigating agency, commission, board, hearing officer, or arbitrator, as applicable, following an investigation and opportunity for an administrative appeal pursuant to Sections 3304 and 3304.5 of the Government Code, that the actions of the peace officer or custodial
 officer were found to violate law or department policy.

(c) “Unfounded” means that an investigation clearly establishes that the allegation is not true.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 988, Sec. 3.   (SB 1421)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

832.9.

(a) A governmental entity employing a peace officer, as defined in Section 830, judge, court commissioner, or an attorney employed by the Department of Justice, the State Public Defender, or a county office of a district attorney or public defender shall reimburse the moving and relocation expenses of those employees, or any member of his or her immediate family residing with the officer in the same household or on the same property when it is necessary to move because the officer has received a credible threat that a life threatening action may be taken against the officer, judge, court commissioner, or an attorney employed by the Department of Justice, the State Public Defender, or a county office of the district attorney or public defender or his or her immediate family as a result of
 his or her employment.

(b) The person relocated shall receive actual and necessary moving and relocation expenses incurred both before and after the change of residence, including reimbursement for the costs of moving household effects either by a commercial household goods carrier or by the employee.

(1) Actual and necessary moving costs shall be those costs that are set forth in the Department of Human Resources rules governing promotional relocations while in the state service. The department shall not be required to administer this section.

(2) The public entity shall not be liable for any loss in value to a residence or for the decrease in value due to a forced sale.

(3) Except as provided in subdivision (c), peace officers, judges, court
 commissioners, and attorneys employed by the Department of Justice, the State Public Defender, or a county office of a district attorney or public defender shall receive approval of the appointing authority prior to incurring any cost covered by this section.

(4) Peace officers, judges, court commissioners, and attorneys employed by the Department of Justice, the State Public Defender, or a county office of a district attorney or public defender shall not be considered to be on duty while moving unless approved by the appointing authority.

(5) For a relocation to be covered by this section, the appointing authority shall be notified as soon as a credible threat has been received.

(6) Temporary relocation housing shall not exceed 60 days.

(7) The public
 entity ceases to be liable for relocation costs after 120 days of the original notification of a viable threat if the peace officer, judge, court commissioner, or attorney employed by the Department of Justice, the State Public Defender, or a county office of a district attorney or public defender has failed to relocate.

(c) (1) For purposes of the right to reimbursement of moving and relocation expenses pursuant to this section, judges shall be deemed to be employees of the State of California and a court commissioner is an employee of the court by which he or she is employed.

(2) For purposes of paragraph (3) of subdivision (b), a court commissioner shall receive approval by the presiding judge of the superior court in the county in which he or she is located.

(3) For purposes of paragraph (3)
 of subdivision (b), judges, including justices of the Supreme Court and the Courts of Appeal, shall receive approval from the Chief Justice, or his or her designee.

(d) As used in this section, “credible threat” means a verbal or written statement or a threat implied by a pattern of conduct or a combination of verbal or written statements and conduct made with the intent and the apparent ability to carry out the threat so as to cause the person who is the target of the threat to reasonably fear for his or her safety or the safety of his or her immediate family.

(e) As used in this section, “immediate family” means the spouse, parents, siblings, and children residing with the peace officer, judge, court commissioner, or attorney employed by the Department of Justice, the State Public Defender, or a county office of a district attorney or public
 defender.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 665, Sec. 182.   (SB 1308)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

832.10.

(a) For purposes of this section, the following definitions shall apply:

(1) “Death incident” means an event where a person has died in the custody or supervision of the local detention facility.

(2) “Local detention facility” means any city, county, city and county, or regional jail, camp, court holding facility, private detention facility, or other facility in which persons are incarcerated.

(3) “Private detention facility” has the same meaning as in Section 7320 of the Government Code.

(4) “Person” includes, but is not limited to, a custodial officer
 or health care staff.

(5) “Custodial officer” means those officers with the rank of deputy, correctional officer, patrol person, or another equivalent sworn or civilian rank whose duties include the supervision of incarcerated or detained persons at a local detention facility.

(6) “Health care staff” means the health authority, individual, or agency that is designated with responsibility for providing health care in the local detention facility.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a) of Section 832.7, or any other law, any record relating to an investigation conducted by the local detention facility involving a death incident maintained by a local detention facility shall not be confidential and shall be made available for public inspection pursuant to the California Public Records Act (Division 10 (commencing with
 Section 7920.000) of Title 1 of the Government Code).

(c) Records disclosed under subdivision (b) shall be subject to all of the following:

(1) The record shall include all investigative reports; photographic, audio, and video evidence; transcripts or recordings of interviews; autopsy reports; all materials compiled and presented for review to the district attorney or to any person or body charged with determining whether to file criminal charges against a person, whether the person’s action was consistent with law and agency policy for purposes of discipline or administrative action, or what discipline to impose or corrective action to take; documents setting forth findings or recommended findings; and copies of disciplinary records relating to the death incident, including any letters of intent to impose discipline, any documents reflecting modifications of discipline due to the
 Skelly or grievance process, and letters indicating final imposition of discipline or other documentation reflecting implementation of corrective action. 

(2) An agency shall redact a record disclosed pursuant to this section only for any of the following purposes:

(A) To remove personal data or information, such as a home address, telephone number, or identities of family members, other than the people’s names and work-related information.

(B) To preserve the anonymity of whistleblowers, complainants, victims, and witnesses.

(C) To protect confidential medical, financial, or other information of which disclosure is specifically prohibited by federal law or would cause an unwarranted invasion of personal privacy that clearly outweighs the strong public
 interest in records about possible misconduct.

(D) Where there is a specific, articulable, and particularized reason to believe that disclosure of the record would pose a significant danger to the physical safety of any person.

(3) Notwithstanding paragraph (2), an agency may redact a record disclosed pursuant to this section, including personal identifying information, where, on the facts of the particular case, the public interest served by not disclosing the information clearly outweighs the public interest served by disclosure of the information.

(4) A local detention facility may withhold a record of a death incident described in subdivision (b) that is the subject of an active criminal or administrative investigation, in accordance with any of the following:

(A) (i) During an active criminal investigation, disclosure may be delayed for up to 60 days from the date the death incident occurred or until the district attorney determines whether to file criminal charges related to the death incident, whichever occurs sooner. If a local detention facility delays disclosure pursuant to this clause, the local detention facility shall provide, in writing, the specific basis for the facility’s determination that the interest in delaying disclosure clearly outweighs the public interest in disclosure. This writing shall include the estimated date for disclosure of the withheld information.

(ii) After 60 days from the death incident, the local detention facility may continue to delay the disclosure of records or information if the disclosure could reasonably be expected to interfere with a criminal enforcement proceeding against any person. If an agency delays disclosure
 pursuant to this clause, the agency shall, at 180-day intervals as necessary, provide, in writing, the specific basis for the agency’s determination that disclosure could reasonably be expected to interfere with a criminal enforcement proceeding. The writing shall include the estimated date for the disclosure of the withheld information. Information withheld by the agency shall be disclosed when the specific basis for withholding is resolved, when the investigation or proceeding is no longer active, or by no later than 18 months after the date of the death incident, whichever occurs sooner.

(iii) In an action to compel disclosure brought pursuant to Section 7923.000 of the Government Code, a local detention facility may justify delay by filing an application to seal the basis for withholding, in accordance with Rule 2.550 of the California Rules of Court, or any successor rule, if disclosure of the written basis itself would impact a privilege
 or compromise a pending investigation. This clause does not prohibit a court from conducting in camera review to determine whether privilege exists.

(B) If criminal charges are filed related to the death incident, the local detention facility may delay the disclosure of records or information until a verdict on those charges is returned at trial or, if a plea of guilty or no contest is entered, the time to withdraw the plea pursuant to Section 1018.

(C) During an administrative investigation into an incident described in subdivision (b), the local detention facility may delay the disclosure of records or information until the facility determines whether the death incident violated a law or agency policy.

(5) The cost of copies of records subject to disclosure pursuant to this subdivision that are made available upon
 the payment of fees covering direct costs of duplication pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 7922.530 of the Government Code shall not include the costs of searching for, editing, or redacting the records.

(6) Except to the extent temporary withholding for a longer period is permitted pursuant to paragraph (4), records subject to disclosure under this section shall be provided at the earliest possible time and no later than 45 days from the date of a request for their disclosure.

(7) (A) For purposes of releasing records pursuant to this subdivision, the attorney-client privilege does not prohibit the disclosure of either of the following:

(i) Factual information provided by the local detention facility to its attorney or factual information discovered in any investigation conducted by, or on
 behalf of, the local detention facility’s attorney.

(ii) Billing records related to the work done by the attorney so long as the records do not relate to active and ongoing litigation and do not disclose information for the purpose of legal consultation between the local detention facility and its attorney.

(B) This paragraph does not prohibit the local detention facility from asserting that a record or information within the record is exempted or prohibited from disclosure pursuant to any other federal or state law. However, to the extent that the local detention facility asserts attorney-client privilege or any other prohibitive disclosure provided by federal or state law, the court may conduct in camera review unless prohibited by law.

(d) This section does not affect the discovery or disclosure of information
 contained in a subject officer’s personnel file pursuant to Section 1043 of the Evidence Code.

(e) This section does not affect the disclosure of other records provided under this chapter or any other law.

(f) This section does not supersede or affect the criminal discovery process outlined in Chapter 10 (commencing with Section 1054) of Title 6 of Part 2, or the admissibility of personnel records pursuant to Section 832.7, which codifies the court decision in Pitchess v. Superior Court (1974) 11 Cal.3d 531.

(g) Nothing in this chapter is intended to limit the public’s right of access as provided for in Long Beach Police Officers Association v. City of Long Beach (2014) 59 Cal.4th 59.

(h) This section shall become operative on July 1,
 2024.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 306, Sec. 1.   (SB 519)   Effective January 1, 2024.   Operative July 1, 2024, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

832.12.

(a) Each department or agency in this state that employs peace officers shall make a record of any investigations of misconduct involving a peace officer in the officer’s general personnel file or a separate file designated by the department or agency. A peace officer seeking employment with a department or agency in this state that employs peace officers shall give written permission for the hiring department or agency to view the officer’s general personnel file and any separate file designated by a department or agency.

(b) Prior to employing any peace officer, each department or agency in this state that employs peace officers shall request, and the hiring department or agency
 shall review, any records made available pursuant to subdivision (a).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 402, Sec. 4.   (SB 16)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

832.13.

Every person employed as a peace officer shall immediately report all uses of force by the officer to the officer’s department or agency.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 402, Sec. 5.   (SB 16)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

832.15.

(a) On and after October 1, 1993, the Department of Justice shall notify a state or local agency as to whether an individual applying for a position as a peace officer, as defined by this chapter, a custodial officer authorized by the employing agency to carry a firearm pursuant to Section 831.5, or a transportation officer pursuant to Section 831.6 authorized by the employing agency to carry a firearm, is prohibited from possessing, receiving, owning, or purchasing a firearm pursuant to state or federal law. If the prohibition is temporary, the notice shall indicate the date that the prohibition expires. However, the notice shall not provide any other information with respect to the basis for the prohibition.

(b) Before providing the information specified in subdivision (a), the applicant shall provide the Department of Justice with fingerprints and other identifying information deemed necessary by the department.

(c) The Department of Justice may charge the applicant a fee sufficient to reimburse its costs for furnishing the information specified in subdivision (a).

(d) The notice required by this section shall not apply to persons receiving treatment under subdivision (a) of Section 8100 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 698, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

832.16.

(a) On and after October 1, 1993, the Department of Justice shall notify a state or local agency employing a peace officer, as defined by this chapter, who is authorized by the employing agency to carry a firearm, as to whether a peace officer is prohibited from possessing, receiving, owning, or purchasing a firearm pursuant to state or federal law. If the prohibition is temporary, the notice shall indicate the date that the prohibition expires. However, the notice shall not provide any other information with respect to the basis for the prohibition.

(b) Before providing the information specified in subdivision (a), the agency employing the peace officer shall provide the Department of Justice with the officer’s fingerprints and other identifying information deemed necessary by the department.

(c) The information specified in this section shall only be provided by the Department of Justice subject to the availability of funding.

(d) The notice required by this section shall not apply to persons receiving treatment under subdivision (a) of Section 8100 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 698, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

832.17.

(a) Upon request by a state or local agency, the Department of Justice shall notify the state or local agency as to whether an individual employed as a custodial or transportation officer and authorized by the employing agency to carry a firearm, is prohibited or subsequently becomes prohibited from possessing, receiving, owning, or purchasing a firearm pursuant to state or federal law. If the prohibition is temporary, the notice shall indicate the date on which the prohibition expires. However, the notice shall not provide any other information with respect to the basis for the prohibition.

(b) Before the department provides the information specified in subdivision (a), the officer shall provide the department with his or her fingerprints and other identifying information deemed necessary by the department.

(c) The department may charge the officer a fee sufficient to reimburse its costs for furnishing the information specified in subdivision (a). A local law enforcement agency may pay this fee for the officer.

(d) The notice required by this section shall not apply to persons receiving treatment under subdivision (a) of Section 8100 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 698, Sec. 11.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

832.18.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature to establish policies and procedures to address issues related to the downloading and storage data recorded by a body-worn camera worn by a peace officer. These policies and procedures shall be based on best practices.

(b) When establishing policies and procedures for the implementation and operation of a body-worn camera system, law enforcement agencies, departments, or entities shall consider the following best practices regarding the downloading and storage of body-worn camera data:

(1) Designate the person responsible for downloading the recorded data from the body-worn
 camera. If the storage system does not have automatic downloading capability, the officer’s supervisor should take immediate physical custody of the camera and should be responsible for downloading the data in the case of an incident involving the use of force by an officer, an officer-involved shooting, or other serious incident.

(2) Establish when data should be downloaded to ensure the data is entered into the system in a timely manner, the cameras are properly maintained and ready for the next use, and for purposes of tagging and categorizing the data.

(3) Establish specific measures to prevent data tampering, deleting, and copying, including prohibiting the unauthorized use, duplication, or distribution of body-worn camera data.

(4) Categorize and tag body-worn camera video at the time the data is downloaded and classified according to the type of event or incident captured in the data.

(5) Specifically state the length of time that recorded data is to be stored.

(A) Unless subparagraph (B) or (C) applies, nonevidentiary data including video and audio recorded by a body-worn camera should be retained for a minimum of 60 days, after which it may be erased, destroyed, or recycled. An agency may keep data for more than 60 days to have it available in case of a civilian complaint and to preserve transparency.

(B) Evidentiary data including video and audio recorded by a body-worn camera under this section should be retained for a minimum
 of two years under any of the following circumstances:

(i) The recording is of an incident involving the use of force by a peace officer or an officer-involved shooting.

(ii) The recording is of an incident that leads to the detention or arrest of an individual.

(iii) The recording is relevant to a formal or informal complaint against a law enforcement officer or a law enforcement agency.

(C) If evidence that may be relevant to a criminal prosecution is obtained from a recording made by a body-worn camera under this section, the law enforcement agency should retain the recording for any time in addition to that specified in subparagraphs (A) and (B), and in the
 same manner as is required by law for other evidence that may be relevant to a criminal prosecution.

(D) In determining a retention schedule, the agency should work with its legal counsel to determine a retention schedule to ensure that storage policies and practices are in compliance with all relevant laws and adequately preserve evidentiary chains of custody.

(E) Records or logs of access and deletion of data from body-worn cameras should be retained permanently.

(6) State where the body-worn camera data will be stored, including, for example, an in-house server that is managed internally, or an online cloud database that is managed by a third-party vendor.

(7) If using a third-party vendor to manage the data storage system, the following factors should be considered to protect the security and integrity of the data:

(A) Using an experienced and reputable third-party vendor.

(B) Entering into contracts that govern the vendor relationship
 and protect the agency’s data.

(C) Using a system that has a built-in audit trail to prevent data tampering and unauthorized access.

(D) Using a system that has a reliable method for automatically backing up data for storage.

(E) Consulting with internal legal counsel to ensure the method of data storage meets legal requirements for chain-of-custody concerns.

(F) Using a system that includes technical assistance capabilities.

(8) Require that all recorded data from body-worn cameras are property of their respective law enforcement agency and shall not be accessed or released for any
 unauthorized purpose, explicitly prohibit agency personnel from accessing recorded data for personal use and from uploading recorded data onto public and social media internet websites, and include sanctions for violations of this prohibition.

(c) (1) For purposes of this section, “evidentiary data” refers to data of an incident or encounter that could prove useful for investigative purposes, including, but not limited to, a crime, an arrest or citation, a search, a use of force incident, or a confrontational encounter with a member of the public. The retention period for evidentiary data are subject to state evidentiary laws.

(2) For purposes of this section, “nonevidentiary data” refers to data that does not necessarily have value to aid in an investigation